Texas statutes.
TRANSPORTATION CODE

TITLE 7. VEHICLES AND TRAFFIC

SUBTITLE I. ENFORCEMENT OF TRAFFIC LAWS

CHAPTER 707. PHOTOGRAPHIC TRAFFIC SIGNAL

ENFORCEMENT SYSTEM PROHIBITED

Sec. 707.001. DEFINITIONS. In this chapter:

(1) "Local authority" has the meaning assigned by Section 541.002.

(2) Repealed by Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 372 (H.B. 1631), Sec. 6(3), eff. June 2, 2019.

(3) "Photographic traffic signal enforcement system" means a system that:

(A) consists of a camera system and vehicle sensor installed to exclusively work in conjunction with an electrically operated traffic-control signal; and

(B) is capable of producing at least two recorded images that depict the license plate attached to the front or the rear of a motor vehicle that is not operated in compliance with the instructions of the traffic-control signal.

(4) "Recorded image" means a photographic or digital image that depicts the front or the rear of a motor vehicle.

(5) "Traffic-control signal" has the meaning assigned by Section 541.304.

Added by Acts 2007, 80th Leg., R.S., Ch. 1149 (S.B. 1119), Sec. 1, eff. September 1, 2007.

Amended by:

Acts 2009, 81st Leg., R.S., Ch. 933 (H.B. 3097), Sec. 2T.01, eff. September 1, 2009.

Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 372 (H.B. 1631), Sec. 6(3), eff. June 2, 2019.

Sec. 707.020. PHOTOGRAPHIC TRAFFIC SIGNAL ENFORCEMENT SYSTEM PROHIBITED. (a) Notwithstanding any other law, a local authority may not implement or operate a photographic traffic signal enforcement system with respect to a highway or street under the jurisdiction of the authority.

(b) The attorney general shall enforce this section.

Added by Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 372 (H.B. 1631), Sec. 2, eff. June 2, 2019.

Sec. 707.021. USE OF EVIDENCE FROM PHOTOGRAPHIC TRAFFIC SIGNAL ENFORCEMENT SYSTEM PROHIBITED. Notwithstanding any other law, a local authority may not issue a civil or criminal charge or citation for an offense or violation based on a recorded image produced by a photographic traffic signal enforcement system.

Added by Acts 2019, 86th Leg., R.S., Ch. 372 (H.B. 1631), Sec. 2, eff. June 2, 2019.